Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3347.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 340A.404, subdivision 2b, is amended to read: Subd. 2b. Special provision; city of St. Paul. new text begin (a) new text end The city of St. Paul may issue an on-sale intoxicating liquor license to the Fitzgerald Theatre, the Great American History Theater at 30 East 10th Street, and the Brave New Workshop at the Palace Theater at 17 West Seventh Place, notwithstanding the limitations of law, or local ordinance, or charter provision relating to zoning or school or church distances. The license authorizes sales on all days of the week to holders of tickets for performances presented by the theatre and to members of the nonprofit corporation holding the license and to their guests. new text begin (b) Notwithstanding any other law, local ordinance, or charter provision, the city of St. Paul may issue an on-sale intoxicating liquor license to the Science Museum of Minnesota, or its concessionaire or operator, for use on the premises of the Science Museum of Minnesota at 120 West Kellogg Boulevard. The license authorizes sales on all days of the week. new text end new text begin (c) Notwithstanding any other law, local ordinance, or charter provision, the city of St. Paul may issue an on-sale intoxicating liquor license to the Union Depot, or its concessionaire or operator, for use on the premises of the Union Depot at 214 Fourth Street East. The license authorizes sales on all days of the week. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective upon approval by the St. Paul City Council and compliance with Minnesota Statutes, section 645.021. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 340A.404, subdivision 4a, is amended to read: Subd. 4a. Publicly owned recreation; entertainment facilities. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, local ordinance, or charter provision, the commissioner may issue on-sale intoxicating liquor licenses: (1) to the state agency administratively responsible for, or to an entity holding a concession or facility management contract with such agency for beverage sales at, the premises of any Giants Ridge Recreation Area building or recreational improvement area owned by the state in the city of Biwabik, St. Louis County; (2) to the state agency administratively responsible for, or to an entity holding a concession or facility management contract with such agency for beverage sales at, the premises of any Ironworld Discovery Center building or facility owned by the state at Chisholm; (3) to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota new text begin or to an entity holding a concessions contract with the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota new text end for events at Northrop Auditorium, the intercollegiate football stadium, including any games played by the Minnesota Vikings at the stadium, and deleted text begin at no more than sevendeleted text end new text begin fornew text end other locations within the boundaries of the University of Minnesotanew text begin that are described in the approved license applicationsnew text end , provided that the Board of Regents has approved an application for a license for the specified location and provided that a license for an intercollegiate football stadium is void unless it meets the conditions of paragraph (b). new text begin Licenses may be issued for space that is not compact and contiguous, provided that all space is included in the description of the licensed premises on the approved license applications. new text end It is solely within the discretion of the Board of Regents to choose the manner in which to carry out these conditions consistent with the requirements of paragraph (b); and (4) to the Duluth Entertainment and Convention Center Authority for beverage sales on the premises of the Duluth Entertainment and Convention Center Arena during intercollegiate hockey games. The commissioner shall charge a fee for licenses issued under this subdivision in an amount comparable to the fee for comparable licenses issued in surrounding cities. (b) No alcoholic beverage may be sold or served at deleted text begin TCFdeleted text end new text begin Huntingtonnew text end Bank Stadium unless the Board of Regents holds an on-sale intoxicating liquor license for the stadium as provided in paragraph (a), clause (3), that provides for the sale of intoxicating liquor at a location in the stadium that is convenient to the general public attending an intercollegiate football game at the stadium. On-sale liquor sales to the general public must be available at that location through half-time of an intercollegiate football game at deleted text begin TCFdeleted text end new text begin Huntingtonnew text end Bank Stadium, and sales at the stadium must comply with section 340A.909. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 340A.412, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Licenses prohibited in certain areas. (a) No license to sell intoxicating liquor may be issued within the following areas: (1) where restricted against commercial use through zoning ordinances and other proceedings or legal processes regularly had for that purpose, except licenses may be issued to restaurants in areas which were restricted against commercial uses after the establishment of the restaurant; (2) within the Capitol or on the Capitol grounds, except as provided under Laws 1983, chapter 259, section 9, or Laws 1999, chapter 202, section 13; (3) on the State Fairgrounds, except as provided under section 37.21, subdivision 2; deleted text begin (4) on the campus of the College of Agriculture of the University of Minnesota; deleted text end deleted text begin (5)deleted text end new text begin (4)new text end within 1,000 feet of a state hospital, training school, reformatory, prison, or other institution under the supervision or control, in whole or in part, of the Direct Care and Treatment executive board or the commissioner of corrections; deleted text begin (6)deleted text end new text begin (5)new text end in a town or municipality in which a majority of votes at the last election at which the question of license was voted upon were not in favor of license under section 340A.416, or within one-half mile of any such town or municipality, except that intoxicating liquor manufactured within this radius may be sold to be consumed outside it; and deleted text begin (7)deleted text end new text begin (6)new text end within 1,500 feet of any public school that is not within a city. (b) The restrictions of this subdivision do not apply to a manufacturer or wholesaler of intoxicating liquor or to a drugstore or to a person who had a license originally issued lawfully prior to July 1, 1967. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 4. Laws 2017, First Special Session chapter 4, article 5, section 12, is amended to read: Sec. 12. FOOD HALL LICENSE; MINNEAPOLIS. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 340A.101, subdivision 25, 340A.401, or 340A.410, subdivision 7, or any other law or ordinance to the contrary, the city of Minneapolis may issue an on-sale intoxicating liquor license for a licensee serving as an anchor tenant for a food hall deleted text begin to be located at 501 30th Avenue Southeastdeleted text end . The license may allow service and consumption anywhere within the licensee establishment, and anywhere within the larger food hall, provided that the larger premises is specified in the on-sale license. Multiple independent food vendors will be able to utilize a common seating area under the control of the liquor license holder to allow the public to purchase and consume food from third parties while also consuming licensed beverages sold by the license holder.new text begin Licenses may only be issued for food halls at the following locations:new text end new text begin (1) 501 30th Avenue Southeast; and new text end new text begin (2) 800 LaSalle Avenue. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective upon approval by the city of Minneapolis and compliance with Minnesota Statutes, section 645.021. new text end Sec. 5. new text begin MINNESOTA STATE UNIVERSITY, MANKATO; SPECIAL LICENSE.new text end new text begin Notwithstanding any other law, local ordinance, or charter provision to the contrary, the city of Mankato may issue an on-sale wine and malt liquor intoxicating liquor license to Minnesota State University, Mankato. A license authorized by this section may be issued for space that is not compact and contiguous, provided that all the space is within the boundaries of the campus of Minnesota State University, Mankato, and is included in the description of the licensed premises on the approved license application. The license under this section authorizes sales on all days of the week to persons attending events at the Taylor Center, subject to the hours and days of sale restrictions in Minnesota Statutes, and any reasonable license conditions or restrictions imposed by the licensing authority. All other provisions of Minnesota Statutes not inconsistent with this section apply to the license authorized under this section. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective upon approval by the Mankato City Council in the manner provided by Minnesota Statutes, section 645.021, subdivisions 2 and 3. new text end Sec. 6. new text begin SPECIAL LIQUOR LAW; CITY OF ROCHESTER.new text end new text begin Notwithstanding any other law, ordinance, or charter provision to the contrary, the city of Rochester may issue an on-sale intoxicating liquor license to the Historic Chateau Theater, located in the city at 15 1st Street Southwest. The license authorizes sales on all days of the week to persons attending performances, exhibitions, or any other events at the theater. The provisions of Minnesota Statutes, chapter 340A, not inconsistent with this section, apply to a license issued under this section. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective upon approval by the Rochester City Council and compliance with Minnesota Statutes, section 645.021. new text end Sec. 7. new text begin CITY OF BLOOMINGTON; ON-SALE BEER AND WINE LICENSE.new text end new text begin Notwithstanding any other law or ordinance to the contrary, the city of Bloomington may issue an on-sale intoxicating liquor license for the Bloomington Dwan Golf Course, located at 3301 West 110th Street. The provisions of Minnesota Statutes, chapter 340A, not inconsistent with this section, apply to the license issued under this section. The city of Bloomington is deemed the licensee under this section, and the provisions of Minnesota Statutes, sections 340A.603 and 340A.604, apply to the license as if the establishment were a municipal liquor store. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective upon approval by the city of Bloomington and compliance with Minnesota Statutes, section 645.021. new text end Sec. 8. new text begin TEMPORARY LICENSES; LAKE OF THE WOODS COUNTY.new text end new text begin Lake of the Woods County may issue temporary licenses pursuant to law for premises of the Baudette Arena Association, without regard to the restriction set forth in Minnesota Statutes, section 340A.412, subdivision 4, paragraph (a), clause (7). new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective upon approval by the Lake of the Woods County Board of Commissioners and compliance with Minnesota Statutes, section 645.021. new text end Sec. 9. new text begin SPECIAL LAW; CITY OF ST. LOUIS PARK.new text end new text begin Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 340A.101, subdivision 25; 340A.401; or 340A.410, subdivision 7, or any other law or ordinance to the contrary, the city of St. Louis Park may issue an on-sale intoxicating liquor license to a licensee serving as an anchor tenant for a food hall located in any portion of the mall commonly known as The Shops at West End. The license may allow service and consumption anywhere within the licensee establishment, and anywhere within the larger food hall, provided that the larger premises is specified in the on-sale license. Multiple independent food vendors will be able to utilize a common seating area under the control of the liquor license holder to allow the public to purchase and consume food from third parties while also consuming licensed beverages sold by the license holder. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective upon approval by the St. Louis Park City Council and compliance with Minnesota Statutes, section 645.021. new text end Sec. 10. new text begin SPECIAL LICENSE; CITY OF SPRINGFIELD.new text end new text begin The city of Springfield may issue an on-sale intoxicating liquor license, an on-sale wine and strong beer license, or an on-sale including Sunday intoxicating liquor license for the city-owned facility known as the Springfield Area Community Center, notwithstanding any law, local ordinance, or charter provision. The provisions of Minnesota Statutes, chapter 340A, not inconsistent with this section, apply to the license issued under this section. The city of Springfield is deemed the licensee under this section, and the provisions of Minnesota Statutes, sections 340A.603 and 340A.604, apply to the license as if the facility was a municipal liquor store. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective upon approval by the Springfield City Council and compliance with Minnesota Statutes, section 645.021. new text end Sec. 11. new text begin SPECIAL LAW; DOUGLAS COUNTY.new text end new text begin (a) Douglas County may issue a temporary license to a food truck for the on-sale of intoxicating liquor at a private event that the food truck has entered into a contract with a person to offer food and beverage services. For purposes of this section, "food truck" means a business that is licensed or permitted by the licensing authority to prepare and sell food from a motorized vehicle or trailer within the municipality. new text end new text begin (b) A license under this section must specify the conditions under which the intoxicating liquor must be dispensed and consumed and shall not be issued unless the licensee demonstrates that it has liability insurance as prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, section 340A.409, to cover the event. The license under this section authorizes sales on all days of the week only to the person who has entered into a contract to offer food and beverage services with the food truck, and the person's guests. new text end new text begin (c) A license under this section is subject to the terms, including a license fee, imposed by the issuing municipality and all laws and ordinances governing the sale of intoxicating liquor. A license under this section authorizes the on-sale of intoxicating liquor for not more than four consecutive days and not more than 12 days per year. No sale under this license may be made outside the hours established by the municipality for on-premises consumption. Licenses under this section are not valid unless first approved by the commissioner of public safety. new text end new text begin (d) The licensee shall notify prior to any private event: new text end new text begin (1) the police chief of the city where the event will take place, if the event will take place within the corporate limits of a city; or new text end new text begin (2) the Douglas County sheriff, if the event will be outside the corporate limits of any city. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective upon approval by the Douglas County Board of Commissioners and compliance with Minnesota Statutes, section 645.021. This section expires one year from the date of approval. new text end